Hawaii statutes.
[§431:21-107] Designation of area.
After consultation with representatives of the United States Geological Survey,
the state department of defense, and the county in which the area is located,
the commissioner shall designate the geographical area eligible for coverage
through the association. Those properties in the designated area that meet the
standards set forth in the plan of operation shall be provided insurance
through the association. [L 1991, c 284, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next